Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:



Req. No. 378 Page 1


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-229.35, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 95, O.S.L. 2022 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1-229.35), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-229.35. A. As used in this section:


1. “FDA” means the United States Food and Drug Administration;


2. “Timely filed premarket tobacco product application” means


an application pursuant to 21 U.S.C., Section 387j, for a vapor


product containing nicotine derived from tobacco marketed in the


United States as of August 8, 2016, that was submitted to the FDA on


or before September 9, 2020, and accepted for filing; and


3. “Vapor product” means a noncombustible product that contains


nicotine and that employs a mechanical heating element, battery,


electronic circuit, or other mechanism, regardless of shape or size,


that can be used to produce a vapor from a solution. Vapor product


includes any cartridge or other container with nicotine that is


intended to be used with an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar,


electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or other similar product or


device. Vapor product does not include any products regulated by


the FDA under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.


B. Beginning July 1, 2023 2025, and annually thereafter, every


manufacturer of a vapor product that is sold or intended to be sold


for retail sale or to a consumer in this state, whether directly or


through a wholesaler, distributor, retailer, or similar intermediary


or intermediaries, shall execute and deliver an attestation under

Req. No. 378 Page 2


penalty of perjury to the Oklahoma Alcoholic Beverage Laws


Enforcement (ABLE) Commission Attorney General certifying that, as


of the date of such attestation form:


1. The vapor product was available for purchase in the United


States as of August 8, 2016, and the manufacturer has applied for a


marketing order for the vapor product by submitting a Premarket


Tobacco Product Application on or before September 9, 2020, to the


United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) The manufacturer


submitted a timely filed premarket tobacco product application for


the vapor product to the FDA pursuant to 21 U.S.C., Section 387j,


and the application either remains under review by the FDA or has


received a denial order that has been and remains stayed by the FDA


or a court order, rescinded by the FDA, or vacated by a court; or


2. The manufacturer has received a marketing granted order or


other authorization for the vapor product from the FDA pursuant to


Section 387j of Title 21 of the United States Code.


B. The C. The manufacturer is not required to submit an


additional marketing granted order or premarket tobacco product


application for the vapor product because a change to the vapor


product merely reflects change to the name, brand style, or


packaging of a vapor product that is covered under paragraph 1 or 2


of subsection B of this section.


D. The attestation form shall separately list each brand name,


product name, flavor, and category including e-liquid, power unit,

Req. No. 378 Page 3


disposable vapor product, device, e-liquid cartridge, or e-liquid


pod for each vapor product that is sold in this state.


E. Each annual attestation form shall be accompanied by:


1. A copy of:


a. the marketing granted order issued by the FDA pursuant


to 21 C.F.R. 1114.31,


b. the acceptance letter issued by the FDA pursuant to 21


C.F.R. 1114.27, for a timely filed premarket tobacco


product application, or


c. the document issued by the FDA or by a court


confirming that the premarket tobacco product


application has received a denial order that has been


and remains stayed by the FDA or a court order,


rescinded by the FDA, or vacated by a court; and


2. A payment of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) the first time


the manufacturer submits an attestation form and a payment of Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for each annual renewal


submission.


F. The information submitted by the manufacturer pursuant to


subsection C of this section shall be considered confidential


commercial or financial information for purposes of Section 24A.1 et


seq of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The manufacturer may


redact certain confidential or commercial information provided under


paragraph 1 of subsection E and paragraph 2 of subsection J of this

Req. No. 378 Page 4


section. The Attorney General shall not disclose such information


except as required or authorized by law.


G. A manufacturer required to submit an attestation form


pursuant to this section shall notify the ABLE Commission Attorney


General within thirty (30) days of any material change to the


attestation form, including whether the FDA has issued or not issued


a market order or other authorization or has ordered the


manufacturer to remove the vapor product, either temporarily or


permanently, from the United States market the issuance or denial of


a marketing authorization or other order by the FDA pursuant to 21


U.S.C., Section 387j, or any other order or action by the FDA or any


court that affects the ability of the vapor product to be introduced


or delivered into interstate commerce for commercial distribution in


the United States.


C. The ABLE Commission


H. 1. No later than September 1, 2026, the Attorney General


shall develop a directory listing all of the manufacturers that have


provided attestations that comply with subsection A of this section


and all vapor products that are listed in such attestations. The


ABLE Commission shall:


1. Make the directory available for public inspection on its


website on or before October 1, 2023; and


2. Update the directory as necessary to correct mistakes and to


add or remove manufacturers or vapor products to maintain the

Req. No. 378 Page 5


directory in conformity with the requirements of this section


maintain and make publicly available on the Attorney General’s


official website a directory that lists all vapor product


manufacturers and all vapor products including brand names, product


names, flavor, and categories to include e-liquid, power unit,


disposable vapor product, device, e-liquid cartridge, or e-liquid


pod for which certification forms have been submitted and approved


by the Attorney General.


2. The Attorney General shall update the directory at least


monthly to ensure accuracy, and shall establish a process to provide


retailers, distributors, and wholesalers and other relevant parties


notice of the initial publication of the directory and changes made


to the directory in the prior month.


D. It shall be unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly,


to knowingly manufacture, distribute, sell, barter, or furnish in


this state any vapor product that is not included in the directory


I. No manufacturer or the manufacturer’s vapor products shall


be included or retained in the directory if the Attorney General


determines that any of the following apply:


1. The manufacturer failed to provide a complete and accurate


attestation form as required by this section;


2. The manufacturer submitted an attestation form that does not


comply with the requirements of subsections D and E of this section;



Req. No. 378 Page 6


3. The manufacturer failed to include with its certification


the payment required by subsection E of this section;


4. The manufacturer sold vapor products in this state required


to be certified under this act during a period when either the


manufacturer or the vapor product had not been certified and listed


on the directory; or


5. The information provided by the manufacturer in its


certification is determined by the Attorney General to contain false


information or contains material misrepresentations or omissions.


J. The Attorney General shall provide manufacturers notice and


an opportunity to cure deficiencies before removing manufacturers or


vapor products from the directory.


1. The Attorney General may not remove a manufacturer or its


vapor products from the directory until at least thirty (30) days


after the manufacturer has been given notice of an intended action.


Notice shall be sufficient and be deemed immediately received by a


manufacturer if the notice is sent either electronically or by


facsimile to an electronic mail address or facsimile number,


provided by the manufacturer in its most recent certification filed


under this section.


2. A manufacturer shall have fifteen (15) days from the date of


service of notice of the Attorney General’s intended action to cure


the deficiencies or establish that the vapor product manufacturer or


its vapor products should be included in the directory.

Req. No. 378 Page 7


3. Retailers shall have thirty (30) days following the removal


of a manufacturer or its vapor products from the directory to sell


such vapor products that were in the retailer’s inventory as of the


date of removal.


4. After thirty (30) days following removal from the directory,


the vapor products of a manufacturer identified in the notice of


removal and intended for retail sale in this state or to a consumer


in this state are subject to seizure from distributors and


retailers, forfeiture from distributors and retailers, and


destruction or disposal, and may not be purchased or sold for retail


sale in this state. The cost of such seizure, forfeiture, and


destruction or disposal shall be borne by the person from whom the


vapor products are confiscated.


5. The directory developed by the Alcoholic Beverage Laws


Enforcement (ABLE) Commission and published prior to the date of


enactment of this act shall be withdrawn on September 1, 2026, or on


the date the Attorney General first makes the new directory


available for public inspection on its website as provided in


subsection H of this section.


K. 1. Except as provided in paragraphs 2 and 3 of this


subsection, beginning September 1, 2026, or on the date that the


Attorney General first makes the directory available for public


inspection on its official website, whichever is later, vapor


products not included in the directory may not be sold for retail

Req. No. 378 Page 8


sale in this state or to a consumer in this state, either directly


or through an importer, distributor, wholesaler, retailer, or


similar intermediary or intermediaries.


2. Each retailer shall have sixty (60) days from the date that


the Attorney General first makes the directory available for


inspection on its public website to sell vapor products that were in


its inventory but not included in the directory or to remove those


vapor products from inventory.


3. Each distributor or wholesaler shall have sixty (60) days


from the date that the Attorney General first makes the directory


available for inspection on its public website to remove those vapor


products intended for retail sale in the state from its inventory.


4. After sixty (60) days following publication of the


directory, vapor products not listed in the directory and intended


for retail sale in this state or to a consumer in this state are


subject to seizure, forfeiture, and destruction or disposal, and may


not be purchased or sold for retail sale in this state except as


provided in this subsection and subsection J of this section. The


cost of such seizure, forfeiture, and destruction or disposal shall


be borne by the person from whom the products are confiscated.


L. The following penalties and remedies shall apply to


violations of this section:


1. A retailer, distributor, wholesaler, or importer who sells


or offers for sale a vapor product for retail sale in this state or

Req. No. 378 Page 9


to a consumer in this state that is not included in the directory


shall be subject to a civil penalty of Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00) for each individual vapor product offered for sale in


violation of this section;


2. For a second violation of this type within a twelve-month


period, the administrative fine established by the Attorney General


shall be at least Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) but


not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each individual


vapor product offered for sale in violation of this section;


3. For a third or any subsequent violation within a twelve-


month period, there shall be an administrative fine of at least Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each individual vapor product


offered for sale in violation of this section;


4. A manufacturer whose vapor products are not listed in the


directory and who causes the vapor products that are not listed to


be sold for retail sale or to a consumer in this state, whether


directly or through an importer, distributor, wholesaler, retailer,


or similar intermediary or intermediaries, is subject to a civil


penalty of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each individual


vapor product offered for sale in violation of this section until


the offending vapor product is removed from the market or until the


offending vapor product is properly listed on the directory. In


addition, any manufacturer that falsely represents any information



Req. No. 378 Page 10


required by a certification form shall be guilty of a misdemeanor


for each false representation;


5. In an action to enforce this act, this state shall be


entitled to recover costs, including the costs of investigation,


expert witness fees, and reasonable attorney fees; and


6. A second or subsequent violation of this section shall


constitute a deceptive trade practice for purposes of the Oklahoma


Deceptive Trade Practices Act and, in addition to the remedies


provided for in this section, shall be subject to the remedies


provided in Section 54 of Title 78 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


M. 1. Any nonresident or foreign manufacturer that has not


registered to do business in this state as a foreign corporation or


business entity shall appoint and continually engage without


interruption, as a condition precedent to having its vapor products


included or retained in the directory, the services of an agent in


this state to act as an agent for the service of process on whom all


process, and any action or proceeding against it concerning or


arising out of the enforcement of this section, may be served in any


manner authorized by law. The service shall constitute legal and


valid service of process on the manufacturer. The manufacturer


shall provide the name, address, phone number, and proof of the


appointment and availability of the agent to perform the duties of


an agent to the satisfaction of the Attorney General.



Req. No. 378 Page 11


2. The manufacturer shall provide notice to the Attorney


General thirty (30) days prior to termination of the authority of an


agent and shall further provide proof to the satisfaction of the


Attorney General of the appointment of a new agent no less than five


(5) days prior to the termination of an existing agent appointment.


If an agent terminates an agency appointment, the manufacturer shall


notify the Attorney General of the termination within five (5) days


and shall include proof to the satisfaction of the Attorney General


of the appointment of a new agent.


3. Any nonresident or foreign manufacturer whose vapor products


are sold for retail sale in this state, who has not appointed and


engaged an agent as required by this section, shall be deemed to


have appointed the Secretary of State as its agent and may be


proceeded against in courts of this state by service of process upon


the Secretary of State. However, the appointment of the Secretary


of State as the agent shall not satisfy the condition precedent for


having the vapor products of the manufacturer included or retained


in the directory.


N. 1. Any nonresident or foreign manufacturer that has not


registered to do business in the state as a foreign corporation or


business entity shall, as a condition precedent to having its name


or its vapor products listed and retained in the directory, submit


to the Attorney General a surety bond or other cash security payable


to the State of Oklahoma in the amount of Twenty-five Thousand

Req. No. 378 Page 12


Dollars ($25,000.00). The bond shall be posted by a corporate


surety located within the United States.


2. The bond shall be conditioned on the performance by the


manufacturer of all requirements and obligations imposed by this


section. A surety on a manufacturer’s bond shall be liable up to


the amount of the bond, and the state may execute on such surety


bond for the payment of fines and penalties imposed on the


manufacturer under this section and for the costs of seizure and


destruction of vapor products sold in violation of this section. If


the state executes on the surety bond, it may require the


manufacturer to provide an additional bond as a condition precedent


for retaining the manufacturer or its vapor products in the


directory.


3. A surety on a bond furnished by a manufacturer as provided


in this section shall be released and discharged from liability to


the state accruing on the bond after expiration of sixty (60) days


from the date upon which such surety shall have lodged with the


Attorney General a written request to be released and discharged.


This provision shall not operate to relieve, release, or discharge


the surety from liability already accrued or which shall accrue


before the expiration of the sixty-day period. The Attorney General


shall, upon receiving any such request, notify the manufacturer who


furnished the bond. Unless the manufacturer, on or before the


expiration of the sixty-day period, files with the Attorney General

Req. No. 378 Page 13


a new bond, with the surety approved by and acceptable to the


Attorney General, the Attorney General shall remove the manufacturer


and its vapor products from the directory.


O. Each wholesaler and retailer of vapor products shall be


subject to at least two unannounced compliance checks by the


Attorney General or its agents, which shall include the ABLE


Commission or local law enforcement, annually for purposes of


enforcing this section, and such compliance checks may be conducted


at any time during normal operating hours. Unannounced follow-up


compliance checks of all noncompliant wholesalers and retailers are


required within thirty (30) days after any violation of this act.


The Attorney General shall publish the results of all compliance


checks at least annually and shall make the results available to the


public on request.


P. The Attorney General shall adopt rules for the implementation


and enforcement of this section.


Q. All fees and penalties collected pursuant to this section


shall be used for administration and enforcement of this section.


R. Starting January 31, 2026, and annually thereafter, the


Attorney General shall electronically submit a report to the


Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker


of the House of Representatives regarding the status of the


directory, manufacturers and vapor products included in the


directory, revenue and expenditures related to administration of

Req. No. 378 Page 14


this section, and enforcement activities undertaken pursuant to this


section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 400.1, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 285, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 400.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 400.1. A. For the purpose of enforcing the tobacco tax


laws of this state, the Oklahoma Tax Commission is authorized,


contingent upon the availability of funds, to establish and maintain


a unit to be known as the “Tobacco Products Tax Enforcement Unit”.


The unit shall enforce the tobacco tax laws of this state and ensure


that all taxes are paid on tobacco products and ensure compliance


with the provisions of Section 1-229.35 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes for tobacco products and vapor products by:


1. Confirming that all entities selling tobacco products or


vapor products in this state are properly licensed as provided in


Section 400 et seq. of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. Verifying that all retailers are only purchasing tobacco


products and vapor products from wholesalers and manufacturers


licensed by the Tax Commission;


3. Verifying that all retailers are only purchasing vapor


products listed in the directory created pursuant to subsection H of


Section 1-229.35 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. 4. Providing a dedicated telephone line and email address


for licensed wholesalers, licensed retailers and the general public

Req. No. 378 Page 15


to report suspected violations of tobacco tax laws; provided, no


entity, individual or those who report violations on behalf of a


licensed wholesaler or retailer shall be required to disclose their


identity;


4. 5. Auditing licensed wholesalers and retailers to ensure all


tobacco product taxes are paid;


5. 6. Issuing fines for violations as provided in Section 400


et seq. of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. 7. Conducting wholesale and retail tobacco inspections to


find and confiscate untaxed tobacco products or vapor products that


may not be sold legally in this state;


7. 8. Establishing data-sharing programs with tax departments


in surrounding states related to tobacco product taxes and illicit


trade in tobacco products or vapor products;


8. 9. Creating an industry advisory committee including


licensed wholesalers and retailers who may represent the entity


related to tobacco products tax enforcement concerns and


suggestions. The industry advisory committee shall be composed of


five (5) members as follows:


a. two members who are licensed wholesalers to be


appointed by the Governor,


b. one member who is a licensed retailer to be appointed


by the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma Senate,



Req. No. 378 Page 16


c. one member who is a licensed retailer to be appointed


by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of


Representatives, and


d. one member who is a licensed wholesaler to be


appointed by the four members provided for in


subparagraphs a through c of this paragraph.


The committee shall meet quarterly. The Oklahoma Tax Commission


shall promulgate rules establishing minimum requirements as may be


deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of the committee; and


9. 10. Working with law enforcement and conducting


investigations to stop illegal acquisition and shipment of tobacco


products or vapor products by persons not licensed to sell tobacco


products or vapor products in this state.


B. The Tax Commission shall annually submit a report to the


Governor, President Pro Tempore of the Senate and Speaker of the


House of Representatives listing the number of wholesale and retail


tobacco inspections conducted, the amount of untaxed or illicit


tobacco products or vapor products confiscated, the number of


tobacco products tax audits conducted, the amount of taxes assessed


and the amount of taxes collected as the result of audits and


confiscations, the number of suspected violations reported and the


actions taken in response, and the number of fines issued and the


amount of fines collected.



Req. No. 378 Page 17


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 400.5, as


amended by Section 4, Chapter 285, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 400.5), is amended to read as follows:


Section 400.5. A. Retailers shall only purchase tobacco


products or vapor products from an Oklahoma-licensed tobacco


wholesaler or vapor product manufacturer evidenced by a current


listing provided by the Oklahoma Tax Commission. All purchase


invoices shall contain the license number of the wholesaler and


shall be made available for inspection by the Tax Commission. Any


purchases of tobacco products from a person who is not holding a


current Oklahoma wholesale tobacco or manufacturer license shall be


punishable by a fine of the greater of One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00) or five times the unpaid tax on such products. The fine


shall be in addition to payment of any unpaid tobacco products tax


and the forfeiture of any tobacco products or vapor products to the


State of Oklahoma this state as provided by Section 414 of this


title. A second or subsequent offense shall be punishable by


revocation of the license. If the retailer fails to pay a fine


within thirty (30) days, the retailer’s license shall be suspended


until the fine is paid in full.


B. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall make available for all


licensed retailers a list of currently licensed wholesalers or vapor


product manufacturers at least monthly or through the use of a


website maintained by or on behalf of the Oklahoma Tax Commission

Req. No. 378 Page 18


with updates made as often as practical but no less than every


thirty (30) days.


C. Fines collected pursuant to the provisions of subsection A


of this section shall be deposited in the Tobacco Products Tax


Enforcement Unit Revolving Fund created in Section 400.6 of this


title.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 401, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 401. A. For the purpose of this article:


1. The word “person” shall mean any individual, company,


limited liability company, corporation, partnership, association,


joint adventure, estate, trust or any other group, or combination


acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular, unless the


intention to give a more limited meaning is disclosed by the


context;


2. The term “Tax Commission” shall mean the Oklahoma Tax


Commission;


3. The word “wholesaler” shall include dealers whose principal


business is that of a wholesale dealer, and who is known to the


trade as such, who shall sell any tobacco products or vapor products


to licensed retail dealers only for the purpose of resale;


4. The word “retailer” shall include every dealer, other than a


wholesaler as defined above, whose principal business is that of



Req. No. 378 Page 19


selling merchandise at retail, who shall sell, or offer for sale,


tobacco products or vapor products;


5. The word “consumer” shall mean a person who comes into


possession of tobacco products or vapor products for the purpose of


consuming it;


6. The words “first sale” shall mean and include the first


sale, or distribution, of tobacco products or vapor products in


intrastate commerce, or the first use or consumption of tobacco


products or vapor products within this state;


7. The words “tobacco products” shall mean any cigars, smoking


tobacco and smokeless tobacco;


8. The term “cigars” shall include any roll of tobacco for


smoking, irrespective of size or shape and irrespective of the


tobacco being flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other


ingredients, where such roll has a wrapper made chiefly of tobacco;


9. The term “smokeless tobacco” shall mean all smokeless


tobacco including snuff and chewing tobacco;


10. The term “snuff” shall mean any finely cut, ground or


powdered tobacco that is not intended to be smoked;


11. The term “chewing tobacco” means any leaf tobacco that is


not intended to be smoked;


12. The term “smoking tobacco” shall mean any pipe tobacco or


roll-your-own tobacco;



Req. No. 378 Page 20


13. The term “pipe tobacco” means any tobacco which, because of


its appearance, type, packaging or labeling, is suitable for use and


likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as tobacco to be


smoked in a pipe;


14. The term “roll-your-own tobacco” means any tobacco which,


because of its appearance, type, packaging or labeling, is suitable


for use and likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as


tobacco for making cigarettes or cigars, or for use as wrappers


therof; and


15. The term “untaxed” means that the full amount of tax has


not been paid as required by Section 400 et seq. of this title; and


16. The term “vapor product” has the same meaning as that term


is defined in Section 1-229.35 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 414, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 414. A. Each truck or vehicle wherefrom tobacco


products or vapor products are sold shall be considered as a place


of business and required to have a wholesale license and a bond of


not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).


B. Any person operating a truck or vehicle by selling,


exchanging or giving away untaxed merchandise covered by this


article tobacco products shall be deemed guilty of violation of same


and shall be penalized as hereinbefore set forth, and untaxed


merchandise tobacco products handled by this person as well as the

Req. No. 378 Page 21


vehicle used to transport the untaxed tobacco products shall be


subject to confiscation by authorized agents of the Tax Commission


or duly authorized peace officers.


C. After seizure or confiscation by such agent or officer, the


merchandise tobacco products and property shall be held until all


taxes, interest and penalties due have been paid. If not paid


within five (5) days after date of seizure, it shall be sold at


public sale by the sheriff of the county where confiscated, after


being advertised by posting of notice of such sale in five public


places in the county where the sale is to occur. The proceeds of


the sale shall be applied to taxes, interest and penalties due and


to the cost of the sale, and the remainder, if any, shall be paid to


the State Treasurer, by the sheriff conducting such sale, to be


deposited to the credit of the General Revenue Fund.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 415, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 285, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 415), is amended to read as follows:


Section 415. A. Every wholesaler of tobacco products or vapor


product manufacturer in this state, as a condition of carrying on


such business, shall annually secure from the Oklahoma Tax


Commission a written license and shall pay an annual fee of Two


Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00); provided, such fee shall not be


applicable if paid pursuant to Section 304 of this title. The Tax


Commission shall promulgate rules which provide a procedure for the

Req. No. 378 Page 22


issuance of a joint license for any wholesaler making application


pursuant to this section and Section 304 of this title. Application


for such license, which shall be made upon such forms as prescribed


by the Tax Commission, shall include the following:


1. The applicant’s agreement to the jurisdiction of the Tax


Commission and the courts of this state for purposes of enforcement


of the provisions of Section 301 et seq. of this title; and


2. The applicant’s agreement to abide by the provisions of


Section 301 et seq. of this title and the rules promulgated by the


Tax Commission with reference thereto. This license, which will be


for the ensuing year, must at all times be displayed in a


conspicuous place so that it can be seen. Persons operating more


than one place of business must secure a license for each place of


business. “Place of business” shall be construed to include the


place where orders are received, or where tobacco products or vapor


products are sold. A “place of business” cannot be a location with


a physical residential address. The Tax Commission shall not issue


a license for a place of business with a physical residential


address. If tobacco products or vapor products are sold on or from


any vehicle, the vehicle shall constitute a place of business, and


the license fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) shall be paid


with respect thereto. However, if the vehicle is owned or operated


by a place of business for which the regular license fee is paid,


the annual fee for the license with respect to such vehicle shall be

Req. No. 378 Page 23


only Ten Dollars ($10.00). The expiration for such vehicle license


shall expire on the same date as the current license of the place of


business.


B. Every retailer in this state, as a condition of carrying on


such business, shall secure from the Tax Commission a license and


shall pay therefor a fee of Thirty Dollars ($30.00). Application


for such license, which shall be made upon such forms as prescribed


by the Tax Commission, shall include the following:


1. The applicant’s agreement to the jurisdiction of the Tax


Commission and the courts of this state for purposes of enforcement


of the provisions of Section 301 et seq. of this title;


2. The applicant’s agreement to abide by the provisions of


Section 301 et seq. of this title and the rules promulgated by the


Tax Commission with reference thereto;


3. The applicant’s agreement that it shall not purchase any


tobacco products or vapor products for resale from a supplier that


does not hold a current wholesaler’s license issued pursuant to this


section; and


4. The applicant’s agreement to sell tobacco products or vapor


products only to consumers.


Such license, which will be for the ensuing three (3) years,


must at all times be displayed in a conspicuous place so that it can


be seen. Upon expiration of such license, the retailer to whom such


license was issued may obtain a renewal license which shall be valid

Req. No. 378 Page 24


for three (3) years or until expiration of the retailer’s sales tax


permit, whichever is earlier, after which a renewal license shall be


valid for three (3) years. The manner and prorated fee for renewals


shall be prescribed by the Tax Commission. Every person operating


under such license as a retailer and who owns or operates more than


one place of business must secure a license for each place of


business. “Place of business” shall be construed to include places


where orders are received or where tobacco products or vapor


products are sold. A “place of business” cannot be a location with


a physical residential address. The Tax Commission shall not issue


a license for a place of business with a physical residential


address.


C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any


person holding a retail license from also holding a wholesaler


license.


D. 1. All wholesale or retail licenses shall be nonassignable


and nontransferable from one person to another person. Such


licenses may be transferred from one location to another location


after an application has been filed with the Tax Commission


requesting such transfer and after the approval of the Tax


Commission.


2. Wholesale and retail licenses shall be applied for on a form


prescribed by the Tax Commission. Any person operating as a


wholesaler or retailer must at all times have an effective unexpired

Req. No. 378 Page 25


license which has been issued by the Tax Commission. If any such


person or licensee continues to operate as such on a license issued


by the Tax Commission which has expired, or operates without ever


having obtained from the Tax Commission such license, such person or


licensee shall, after becoming delinquent for a period in excess of


fifteen (15) days, pay to the Tax Commission, in addition to the


annual license fee, a penalty of Ten Dollars ($10.00) per day on


each delinquent license for each day so operated in excess of


fifteen (15) days. The penalty provided for herein shall not exceed


the annual license fee for such license. The penalties collected


pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph shall be deposited in


the Tobacco Products Tax Enforcement Unit Revolving Fund created in


Section 400.6 of this title.


E. No license may be granted, maintained or renewed if any of


the following conditions apply to the applicant. For purposes of


this section, “applicant” includes any combination of persons owning


directly or indirectly, in the aggregate, more than ten percent


(10%) of the ownership interests in the applicant:


1. The applicant owes Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more in


delinquent tobacco products taxes;


2. The applicant had a wholesaler or retailer license revoked


by the Tax Commission within the past two (2) years; or





Req. No. 378 Page 26


3. The applicant has been convicted of a crime relating to


stolen or counterfeit tobacco products or vapor products, or


receiving stolen or counterfeit tobacco products or vapor products.


F. No person or entity licensed pursuant to the provisions of


this section shall purchase tobacco products or vapor products from


or sell tobacco products or vapor products to a person or entity


required to obtain a license unless such person or entity has


obtained such license.


G. In addition to any civil or criminal penalty provided by


law, upon a finding that a licensee has violated any provision of


Section 301 et seq. of this title, the Tax Commission may revoke or


suspend the license or licenses of the licensee pursuant to the


procedures applicable to revocation of a license set forth in


Section 418 of this title.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 417, as


amended by Section 5, Chapter 285, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 417), is amended to read as follows:


Section 417. A. All tobacco products upon which a tax is


levied by Section 400 et seq. of this title and all tobacco products


sold, offered for sale or imported into this state in violation of


the provisions of Section 403.2 of this title, and all vapor


products sold or offered for sale in violation of Section 1-229.35


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, found in the possession,


custody or control of any person for the purpose of being consumed,

Req. No. 378 Page 27


sold or transported from one place to another in this state, for the


purpose of evading or violating the provisions of Section 400 et


seq. of this title, or with intent to avoid payment of the tax


imposed thereunder, or with intent to avoid complying with the


requirements of Section 1-229.35 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and any vehicle being used in avoidance of such tax or


such requirements may be seized by any authorized agent of the


Oklahoma Tax Commission or any sheriff, deputy sheriff or police


within the state. Tobacco products or vapor products from the time


of seizure shall be forfeited to the State of Oklahoma and


assessment of penalty as provided thereby and assessment for any


delinquent taxes found to be owing. A proper proceeding shall be


filed to maintain such seizure and prosecute the forfeiture as


herein provided; the provisions of this section shall not apply,


however, where the tax on such tobacco products does not exceed One


Dollar ($1.00).


B. All such tobacco products or vapor products so seized shall


first be listed and appraised by the officer making such seizure and


turned over to the Tax Commission and a receipt taken therefor.


C. The person making such seizure shall immediately make and


file a written report thereof to the Tax Commission, showing the


name of the person making such seizure, the place where seized, the


person from whom seized, the property seized and an inventory and


appraisement thereof, which inventory shall be based on the usual

Req. No. 378 Page 28


and ordinary retail price or value of the articles seized, and the


Attorney General, in the case of tobacco products sold, offered for


sale or imported into this state in violation of the provisions of


Section 403.2 of this title or in violation of Section 1-229.35 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Within sixty (60) days of


seizure, the person from whom the property was seized may file a


request for hearing with the Tax Commission or the Attorney General


to show why the seized property should not be forfeited and


destroyed. If a hearing is requested, the owner of the tobacco


products or vapor products shall be given at least ten (10) days’


notice of the hearing. If no request for hearing is filed within


the time provided, the property seized will be forfeited and


destroyed.


D. The seizure of such tobacco products or vapor products shall


not relieve the person from whom such tobacco products or vapor


products were seized from prosecution or the payment of penalties.


E. The forfeiture provisions of Section 400 et seq. of this


title shall only apply to persons having possession of or


transporting tobacco products or vapor products with intent to


barter, sell or give away the same.


SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 420.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 420.1. A. Each wholesaler of tobacco products or vapor


product manufacturer, as defined in Section 400 of this title, shall

Req. No. 378 Page 29


maintain copies of invoices or equivalent documentation for each of


its facilities for every transaction in which the wholesaler is the


seller, purchaser, consignor, consignee or recipient of tobacco


products or vapor products. The invoices or documentation shall


contain the wholesaler’s tobacco license number and the retailer’s


tobacco license number if the sale is to a retailer and the quantity


by brand style of the tobacco products or vapor products involved in


the transaction. Each wholesaler shall maintain the documents


required by this subsection for a period of three (3) years.


B. Each retailer of tobacco products or vapor products, as


defined in Section 400 of this title, shall maintain copies of


invoices or equivalent documentation for every transaction in which


the retailer receives or purchases tobacco products or vapor


products at each of its facilities. The invoices or documentation


shall show the name, address, and tobacco license number of the


wholesaler from whom, or the address of another facility of the same


retailer from which, the tobacco products or vapor products were


received, the quantity of each brand style received in such


transaction, the date the tobacco products or vapor products were


received and the retail cigarette license number or sales tax


license number. Each retailer shall maintain the documents required


by this subsection for a period of one (1) year.


SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 422, is


amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 378 Page 30


Section 422. All wholesalers or retailers selling or


distributing such tobacco products or vapor products under the


provisions of this act shall comply with the provisions of such


sections, and the rules and regulations of the Oklahoma Tax


Commission as to such sale or distribution, and failure to so comply


shall constitute grounds for revocation of any license issued to the


wholesaler or retailer by the Tax Commission.


SECTION 10. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-378 CAD 1/16/2025 3:34:44 PM























Req. No. 378 Page 31